Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB975.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "human trafficking" in section 3001 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3001. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Human trafficking." Any activity in violation of [section] any of the following:(1) Section 3011 (relating to trafficking in individuals) either alone or in conjunction with an activity in violation of section 3012 (relating to involuntary 12345678910111213141516171819 servitude).(2) Section 3011.1 (relating to trafficking in undocumented immigrants).* * *Section 2. Title 18 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3011.1. T rafficking in undocumented immigrants. (a) Offense defined.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a person commits a felony of the third degree if the person encourages or induces an undocumented immigrant to enter or remain in this Commonwealth by concealing, harboring or shielding the undocumented immigrant from detection by law enforcement personnel or Federal immigration authorities in violation of Federal law.(b) Felony of the second degree.--A n offense under this section shall be graded as a felony of the second degree if:(1) the person commits the offense in a manner that creates a substantial likelihood that the undocumented immigrant will suffer serious harm or death;(2) the undocumented immigrant is a minor at the time of the offense;(3) the person knows or recklessly disregards that the undocumented immigrant will be subjected to labor servitude; or(4) the person knows or recklessly disregards that the undocumented immigrant will be subjected to sexual servitude.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Federal immigration authority." The United States Department of Homeland Security, the United States Immigration 20250HB0975PN1058 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and Customs Enforcement, the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, the United States Customs and Border Protection or other entity to which a Federal immigration agency delegates or assigns the authority to detect, investigate or enforce violations of Federal immigration law.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0975PN1058 - 3 - 123456